Utah statutes.
76-8-102.   Campaign contributions not prohibited.
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the giving or receiving
of campaign contributions made for the purpose of defraying the costs of a
political campaign. No person shall be convicted of an offense solely on the
evidence that a campaign contribution was made and that an appointment or
nomination was subsequently made by the person to whose campaign or political
party the contribution was made.
